New Jersey, session 222, A931.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.     The New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall implement safety policies for roadside maintenance performed by employees of the authority, which shall include, but not be limited to: (1)  a provision that prohibits employees of the authority from using power tools in inclement weather, including moderate to heavy rain, to perform non-emergency roadside maintenance as determined by the authority; (2)  a provision that requires that all available precautions be taken to ensure the immediate safety of employees of the authority performing emergency roadside maintenance in inclement weather, including moderate to heavy rain; (3)  a provision that requires that all roadside maintenance operations involving the use of gas-powered landscaping equipment be performed during daylight hours, except in emergency situations as determined by the authority; and (4)  a provision that requires that portable roadside light towers be used during the performance of all roadside maintenance performed at times other than during daylight hours. b.    As used in this section, all available precautions shall include, but shall not be limited to, placing roadside warning signs and safety vehicles at least one-fourth of a mile before an emergency roadside maintenance work zone and using variable message signs to inform motorists that emergency roadside maintenance is being performed ahead. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.